Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1260
Recognition and enforcement.

A court of this state shall accord full faith and credit to an order issued by another state and consistent with the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act which enforces a child custody determination by a court of another state unless the order has been vacated, stayed, or modified by a court having jurisdiction to do so under sections 43-1238 to 43-1247.

Laws 2003, LB 148, § 35.